test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-TI-maham_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - mâham -  : # Ordinary VTI am-final verb,  Wolvengrey p 397

     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Sg: nimâhên
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Sg: kimâhên
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Sg: mâham
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+4Sg/Pl: mâhamiyiwa
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+1Pl: nimâhênân
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+12Pl: [kimâhênaw, kimâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+2Pl: kimâhênâwâw
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prs+3Pl: mâhamwak

     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Sg: [nikî-mâhên, nikîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Sg: [kikî-mâhên, kikîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kî-mâham, kîmâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mâhamiyiwa, kîmâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+1Pl: [nikî-mâhênân, nikîmâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+12Pl: [kikî-mâhênaw, kikîmâhênaw, kikî-mâhênânaw, kikîmâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+2Pl: [kikî-mâhênâwâw, kikîmâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Prt+3Pl: [kî-mâhamwak, kîmâhamwak]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Sg: [nika-mâhên, nikamâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Sg: [kika-mâhên, kikamâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Sg: [ka-mâham, kamâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+4Sg/Pl: [ka-mâhamiyiwa, kamâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+1Pl: [nika-mâhênân, nikamâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+12Pl: [kika-mâhênaw, kikamâhênaw, kikamâhênânaw, kika-mâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+2Pl: [kika-mâhênâwâw, kikamâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Def+3Pl: [ka-mâhamwak, kamâhamwak]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Sg: [niwî-mâhên, niwîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Sg: [kiwî-mâhên, kiwîmâhên]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Sg: [wî-mâham, wîmâham]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mâhamiyiwa, wîmâhamiyiwa]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+1Pl: [niwî-mâhênân, niwîmâhênân]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+12Pl: [kiwî-mâhênaw, kiwîmâhênaw, kiwî-mâhênânaw, kiwîmâhênânaw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+2Pl: [kiwî-mâhênâwâw, kiwîmâhênâwâw]
     mâham+V+AI+Ind+Fut+Int+3Pl: [wî-mâhamwak, wîmâhamwak]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Sg: [ê-mâhamân, êmâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Sg: [ê-mâhaman, êmâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Sg: [ê-mâhahk, êmâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mâhamiyit, êmâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+1Pl: [ê-mâhamâhk, êmâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+12Pl: [ê-mâhamahk, êmâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+2Pl: [ê-mâhamêk, êmâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prs+3Pl: [ê-mâhahkik, êmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Sg: [ê-kî-mâhamân, êkîmâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Sg: [ê-kî-mâhaman, êkîmâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Sg: [ê-kî-mâhahk, êkîmâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-mâhamiyit, êkîmâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+1Pl: [ê-kî-mâhamâhk, êkîmâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+12Pl: [ê-kî-mâhamahk, êkîmâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+2Pl: [ê-kî-mâhamêk, êkîmâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Prt+3Pl: [ê-kî-mâhahkik, êkîmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Sg: [ê-wî-mâhamân, êwîmâhamân]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Sg: [ê-wî-mâhaman, êwîmâhaman]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Sg: [ê-wî-mâhahk, êwîmâhahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-mâhamiyit, êwîmâhamiyit]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+1Pl: [ê-wî-mâhamâhk, êwîmâhamâhk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+12Pl: [ê-wî-mâhamahk, êwîmâhamahk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+2Pl: [ê-wî-mâhamêk, êwîmâhamêk]
     mâham+V+AI+Cnj+Fut+Int+3Pl: [ê-wî-mâhahkik, êwîmâhahkik]
     
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Sg: mâhamâni
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Sg: mâhamani
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Sg: mâhêci
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mâhamici
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+1Pl: mâhamâhki
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+12Pl: [mâhamahko, mâhamahki]
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+2Pl: mâhamêko
     mâham+V+AI+Fut+Cond+3Pl: mâhahkwâwi

     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mâha
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mâhamok
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Imm+12Pl: mâhêtan
     
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mâhamôhkan
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mâhamôhkêk
     mâham+V+AI+Imp+Del+12Pl: mâhamôhkahk
